Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 4
Exempt Property and Allowances

§ 15-2-401. Applicable law.

This part applies to the estate of a decedent who dies domiciled in this state. Rights to the homestead allowance and to exempt property for a decedent who dies not domiciled in this state are governed by the law of the decedent’s domicile at death.

§ 15-2-402. Homestead allowance.

The homestead allowance is exempt from and has priority over all claims against the estate except as hereinafter set forth. The homestead allowance is in addition to any share passing to the surviving spouse or minor or disabled child by the will of the decedent unless otherwise provided in the will, or by intestate succession, or by way of elective share. The amount of the homestead allowance shall be fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). The homestead allowance is not a right to claim ownership of, or succession to, any homestead owned by the decedent at the time of the decedent’s death but is only the right to claim the sum set forth above. The right to a homestead allowance is determined as follows:

If there is a surviving spouse of the decedent, the surviving spouse shall be entitled to a homestead allowance.

If there is no surviving spouse, and there are one (1) or more children under the age of twenty-one (21) years whom the decedent was obligated to support or children who were in fact being supported by the decedent and who are disabled, as provided in 42 U.S.C. section 1382c, then each such minor or disabled child is entitled to a portion of the homestead allowance in the amount of the homestead allowance divided by the number of such minor or disabled children entitled to receive the homestead allowance.

§ 15-2-403. Exempt property.

In addition to any homestead allowance, the decedent’s surviving spouse is entitled from the estate to [a] value, not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in excess of any security interests therein, in tangible personal property including, but not limited to, household furniture, automobiles, furnishings, appliances, family heirlooms and personal effects, subject to the terms of section 15-2-406, Idaho Code. If there is no surviving spouse, the decedent’s children are entitled jointly to the same tangible personal property, subject to the terms of section 15-2-406, Idaho Code. Rights to exempt property have priority over all claims against the estate. These rights are in addition to any benefit or share passing to the surviving spouse or children by the will of the decedent, unless otherwise provided in the will, or by intestate succession, or by way of elective share.

§ 15-2-404. Family allowance. [Repealed.]

§ 15-2-405. Source — Determination — Documentation — Miscellaneous provisions.

If the estate is otherwise sufficient, property specifically devised, including the provisions pursuant to section 15-2-513, Idaho Code, may not be used to satisfy rights to the homestead allowance or exempt property. Subject to this restriction, the surviving spouse, the guardians of the minor children, or children who are adults may select property of the estate as homestead allowance or exempt property. The personal representative may make these selections if the surviving spouse, the children or the guardians of the minor children are unable or fail to do so within a reasonable time or if there is no guardian of a minor child. The personal representative may execute an instrument to establish the homestead allowance or exempt property. The personal representative or any interested person aggrieved by any selection, determination, payment, proposed payment, or failure to act under this section may petition the court for appropriate relief. Despite any language to the contrary in this chapter, the homestead allowance and exempt property are not mandatory or automatic, but rather must be applied for by the surviving spouse and/or children, as appropriate, as set forth in this title. Even though the allowance and the right to apply for exempt property are not claims against estates, the manner of and time period for applying for the allowance or the exempt property shall be the same as set forth in sections 15-3-801, 15-3-803 and 15-3-804, Idaho Code; provided however, that the personal representative shall not be required to give actual notice to a surviving spouse or a minor or disabled child of the right to apply for the homestead allowance or the exempt property, and provided further that any notice actually given by the personal representative does not need to make any additional or special reference to an application by the surviving spouse or minor or disabled or adult children also being barred if not submitted within the time period set forth in the notice. Also, the personal representative shall not be liable to the surviving spouse, minor or disabled or adult child, any creditor, or any other successor to the estate in the same manner as provided in section 15-3-801(c), Idaho Code, as a result of giving or failing to give notice. The homestead allowance and exempt property may not be enforced or applied for on behalf of a surviving spouse or a minor or adult child of the decedent by a creditor of the surviving spouse or a minor or disabled or adult child of the decedent, or by any person or entity claiming by, through, or because of the surviving spouse or minor or disabled or adult child of the decedent. Despite any language to the contrary in other sections of this chapter, the homestead allowance and exempt property do not take precedence over reasonable administrative costs and expenses of the estate of the decedent.

§ 15-2-406. Limitations on exempt property and homestead allowance by will.

The decedent may provide by will that a surviving spouse, and/or adult children, but not minor or disabled children:

Are not entitled to any exempt property or homestead allowance; or

Are entitled to limited exempt property or a limited homestead allowance, as provided in the will; but

May not condition such elimination or limitation upon whether the estate of the decedent is subject to a claim for estate recovery for medicaid benefits paid to the decedent or to a spouse of the decedent.